Louisiana, session 2026, HB168.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:574.23 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§574.23. Transitional reentry program for female parolees; establishment
A. For the purposes of this Section, "transitional reentry program" means a
structured reentry preparatory program administered by the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections for female parolees that is designed to facilitate their safe and
successful reintegration into the community.
B. A female offender shall be eligible for consideration of placement in the
transitional reentry program if she meets all of the following conditions:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 15:574.4, she is currently eligible
for parole consideration and has met all of the following criteria:
(a) She has served at least five years of imprisonment in actual custody.
(b) The instant conviction or any prior conviction is not a sex offense as
defined in R.S. 15:541.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 168 ENROLLED
(c) She is within six months of her projected release date based on
diminution of sentence pursuant to R.S. 15:571.3.
(d) She has not been denied parole in the previous twelve months.
(e) She has not committed any major disciplinary offenses in the twelve
months prior to her entering the program. A major disciplinary offense is an offense
identified as a Schedule B offense by the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections in the Disciplinary Rules and Procedures for Adult Offenders.
(2) She has been granted parole pursuant to this Part.
(3) She voluntarily agrees to participate in and adhere to any additional
screening, assessment, or eligibility requirements established by the Department of
Public Safety and Corrections.
Section 2. R.S. 15:828.4 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.